Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 5
SELECTIVE SERVICE REGISTRATION AWARENESS AND COMPLIANCE

Sec.

§ 46-501. Purpose of the chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to encourage compliance with the federal military selective service act and to protect the eligibility of the citizens of this state who are subject to the provisions of the federal statute to receive federal financial assistance for postsecondary education and for employment with the executive branch of the federal government. The federal selective service registration awareness and compliance act requires persons subject to the provisions of the federal military selective service act to be in compliance with the requirements of that federal statute as a condition of eligibility for enrollment at a state-supported institution of postsecondary education, or for state-supported scholarships, programs of financial assistance funded by state revenue including federal funds, gifts or grants accepted by the state, or for employment by the state or any political subdivision.

§ 46-502. Legislative findings.

The legislature of the state of Idaho finds that the military selective service act at 50 U.S.C. sec. 451 [sec. 3801] et seq. requires all male citizens and every other male person residing in the United States, except for lawfully admitted nonimmigrant aliens, upon reaching their eighteenth birthday to register with the United States selective service system. The legislature further finds that federal statutes limit eligibility for federal student financial assistance and eligibility for employment within the executive branch of the federal government to persons who are in compliance with the requirements of the federal military selective service act.

§ 46-503. Eligibility for postsecondary education and financial assistance — Responsibility to verify compliance.

A person may not enroll in a state-supported institution of postsecondary education unless he is in compliance with the federal military selective service act.

A person may not receive a loan, grant, scholarship or other financial assistance for postsecondary education funded by state revenue, including federal funds or gifts and grants accepted by this state, or receive a student loan guaranteed by the state unless he is in compliance with the federal military selective service act.

It shall be the duty of all officials having charge of and authority over state-supported institutions of postsecondary education and over the granting of state-supported financial assistance for postsecondary education to assure themselves that applicants are in compliance with the federal military selective service act. The institutions are authorized to develop the necessary form to allow the applicant to certify compliance with the selective service act.

§ 46-504. Eligibility for employment — Responsibility to verify compliance.

No male person who has attained the age of eighteen (18) years who fails to be in compliance with the federal selective service act shall be eligible for employment by or service for the state of Idaho, or a political subdivision of the state, including all boards and commissions, departments, agencies, institutions and instrumentalities.

It shall be the duty of all officials having charge of and authority over hiring of employees by the state or political subdivisions of the state to assure themselves that applicants are in compliance with the federal military selective service act. The hiring authorities are authorized to develop the necessary form to allow the applicant to certify compliance with the selective service act.

§ 46-505. Exceptions to the requirements of this chapter.

A person shall not be denied a right, privilege or benefit under this chapter by reason of failure to present himself for and submit to the requirement to register pursuant to the federal military selective service act if:

The requirement for the person to so register has terminated or become inapplicable to the person; or

The person is serving or has already served in the armed forces, or has a condition that would preclude acceptability for military service.